Washington statutes.
RCW 43.167.050

Role of state and local government agencies.

Prior to making siting, design, and construction decisions for future major public facilities, public works projects, or capital projects with significant public funding, state and local government agencies may:

(1) Communicate and consult with the community preservation and development authority and impacted community, including assessing the compatibility of the proposed project with the strategic plan adopted by the authority; and

(2) Make reasonable efforts to ensure that negative, cumulative effects of multiple projects upon the impacted community are minimized.

[ 2007 c 501 s 8.]